Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LOWER SIOUX INDIAN COMMUNITY.new text end new text begin $808,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education for a grant to the Lower Sioux Indian Community in Redwood County for predesign and design of a Dakota language immersion birth through grade 4 public charter school. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end